Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0066.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15a. (1) If an adult foster care facility is supplied by well water that is of sufficient volume and that does not exceed the maximum permissible level for any contaminant, a local unit of government or an authority established by 1 or more local units of government shall not require the facility to connect to a different waterworks system. (2) As used in this section, "adult foster care facility" or "facility" means an adult foster care facility as defined in section 3 of the adult foster care facilities licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.703, that provides care to 50 or fewer residents.